Utah statutes.
32A-1-118.   Liability insurance -- Governmental immunity.
(1)  The department shall maintain insurance against loss on each motor
vehicle operated by it on any public highway.  Each motor vehicle shall be
covered for:
(a)  any liability imposed by law upon the department for damages from bodily
injuries suffered by any person or persons by reason of the ownership,
maintenance, or use of the motor vehicle; and
(b)  any liability or loss from damage to or destruction of property of any
description, including liability of the department for the resultant loss of
use of the property, which results from accident due to the ownership,
maintenance, or use of the motor vehicle.
(2)  The department is liable to respond in damages in all cases if a private
corporation under the same circumstances would be liable.
(3)  The provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 7, Governmental Immunity Act of
Utah, apply in all actions commenced against the department in any action for
damages sustained as a result of department ownership, maintenance, or use of
motor vehicles under Subsections (1) and (2).  Immunity from suit against the
commission or any member of the commission, is in all respects retained in any
such action.
